Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 10
THREE LAKES WATER AND SANITATION DISTRICT ACT

Section

32-10-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Three Lakes Water and Sanitation District Act".

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1002, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-1.

32-10-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly determines, finds, and declares that:

Certain areas in this state possess natural characteristics which make them attractive for the building of seasonal homes and tourist facilities. There is an increasing need to build public facilities in such areas in order to accommodate the needs of the seasonal population. Many of these areas contain large federal land holdings which attract seasonal users. The increasing public use in such areas is leading to serious water quality problems, a factor of concern to all the citizens of this state. Such an area is the three lakes area of Grand county, surrounding Grand lake, Shadow Mountain lake, and lake Granby. The general assembly thus declares that the creation of this district promotes the health, comfort, convenience, safety, and welfare of all the people of the state and visitors to the state, and will be of special benefit to the inhabitants of the district and the property therein.

All property to be acquired by the district under this article shall be owned, operated, administered, and maintained for and on behalf of all of the people of the district;

The provision in this article for the purposes, powers, duties, privileges, immunities, rights, liabilities, and disabilities concerning the district will serve a public use;

The district created by this article is a body corporate and politic, a political subdivision of the state, and a municipal corporation with the powers provided in this article;

Any notice provided for in this article for any purpose is reasonably calculated to inform each person who has a legally protected interest which may be directly and adversely affected by any proceedings under this article;

The necessity for this article results from the population, growth, and development in the area included by this article and from the resultant pollution of Grand lake, Shadow Mountain lake, and lake Granby;

A general law cannot be made applicable to the district, and to properties, powers, duties, privileges, immunities, rights, liabilities, and disabilities pertaining thereto as provided in this article, because of the number of atypical factors and special conditions concerning them;

The powers, privileges, and rights granted in this article and the duties, immunities, liabilities, and disabilities provided in this article comply in all respects with any requirement or limitation imposed by any constitutional provision;

For the accomplishment of the purposes provided in this section, the provisions of this article shall be broadly construed.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1002, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-2.

32-10-103. Definitions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1003, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-3.

L. 77:

(7) amended, p. 1513, § 78, effective July 15.

L. 87:

IP(5)(a), (5)(a)(II), and (5)(b) amended, p. 337, § 107, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(4), (5)(a), (7), (10), and (13) amended and (2.5) added, p. 912, § 167, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(5)(a)(I) amended, p. 1775, § 46, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-104. Creation of district.

There is hereby created a district known and designated as the "three lakes water and sanitation district".

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1004, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-4.

32-10-105. Boundaries of district.

The area comprising the district shall consist of the lands located in Grand county, described as follows:

Beginning at the NE corner Section 1, T. 4 N., R. 76 W., of the 6th principal meridian; thence southerly along the east lines of Sections 1, 12, 13, 24, and 25, all in T. 4 N., R. 76 W., to the SE corner of said Section 25; thence easterly along the north lines of Sections 31 and 32, T. 4 N., R. 75 W., to the NE corner of said Section 32; thence southerly along the east line of Section 32, T. 4 N., R. 75 W., to the SE corner of said Section 32; thence easterly along the north line of Section 4, T. 3 N., R. 75 W., to the N 1/4 corner of said Section 4; thence southerly along the north-south centerlines of Section 4 and Section 9, T. 3 N., R. 75 W., to the center of said Section 9; thence westerly along the east-west centerlines of Sections 9, 8, and 7, T. 3 N., R. 75 W., to a point on the easterly shoreline of Shadow Mountain lake; thence southerly along the easterly shoreline of Shadow Mountain lake through Sections 7, 18, and 19, T. 3 N., R. 75 W., to the Shadow Mountain lake dam at the centerline of the Colorado river, in said Section 19; thence southerly along the centerline of the Colorado river, Columbine bay, and Grand bay of lake Granby through Sections 19, 30, 29, and 32, T. 3 N., R. 75 W., to a point on the south line of said Section 32, which line is also the north line of Section 5, T. 2 N., R. 75 W.; thence easterly along the north line of said Section 5 to the NE corner of Section 5, T. 2 N., R. 75 W.; thence southerly along the east lines of Sections 5 and 8, T. 2 N., R. 75 W., to the E 1/4 corner of said Section 8; thence easterly along the east-west centerline of Section 9, T. 2 N., R. 75 W., to the E 1/4 corner of said Section 9; thence southerly along the east line of Section 9, T. 2 N., R. 75 W., to the SE corner of said Section 9; thence easterly along the north lines of Sections 15 and 14, T. 2 N., R. 75 W., to the NE corner of said Section 14; thence southerly along the east lines of Sections 14 and 23, T. 2 N., R. 75 W., to the SE corner of said Section 23; thence westerly along the south lines of Sections 23, 22, and 21, T. 2 N., R. 75 W., to the S 1/4 corner of said Section 21; thence northerly along the north-south centerline of said Section 21 to the S 1/4 corner of Section 16, T. 2 N., R. 75 W.; thence westerly along the south lines of Sections 16, 17, and 18, T. 2 N., R. 75 W., and Sections 13, 14, and 15, T. 2 N., R. 76 W., to the SW corner of said Section 15; thence northerly along the west lines of Sections 15, 10, and 3, T. 2 N., R. 76 W., to the W 1/4 corner of said Section 3; thence westerly along the east-west centerline of Section 4, T. 2 N., R. 76 W., to the center of said Section 4; thence northerly along the north-south centerline of said Section 4, T. 2 N., R. 76 W., and the north-south centerline of Section 33, T. 3 N., R. 76 W., to the center of said Section 33; thence westerly along the east-west centerlines of Sections 33, 32, and 31, T. 3 N., R. 76 W., to the W 1/4 corner of said Section 31; thence northerly along the west line of Section 31, T. 3 N., R. 76 W., to the NW corner of said Section 31; thence easterly along the north line of said Section 31, T. 3 N., R. 76 W., to the N 1/4 corner of said Section 31; thence northerly along the north-south centerline of Section 30, T. 3 N., R. 76 W., to the N 1/4 corner of said Section 30; thence easterly along the north line of Section 30, T. 3 N., R. 76 W., to the NE corner of said Section 30; thence northerly along the west line of Section 20, T. 3 N., R. 76 W., to the NW corner of said Section 20; thence easterly along the north lines of Sections 20, 21, and 22, T. 3 N., R. 76 W., to the NE corner of said Section 22; thence northerly along the west lines of Sections 14 and 11, T. 3 N., R. 76 W., to the NW corner of said Section 11; thence easterly along the north line of Section 11, T. 3 N., R. 76 W., to the N 1/4 corner of said Section 11; thence northerly along the north-south centerlines of Section 2, T. 3 N., R. 76 W., and Section 35, T. 4 N., R. 76 W., to the N 1/4 corner of said Section 35; thence easterly along the north line of Section 35, T. 4 N., R. 76 W., to the NE corner of said Section 35; thence northerly along the west lines of Sections 25, 24, and 13, T. 4 N., R. 76 W., to the NW corner of said Section 13; thence westerly along the south line of Section 11, T. 4 N., R. 76 W., to the S 1/4 corner of said Section 11; thence northerly along the north-south centerlines of Sections 11 and 2, T. 4 N., R. 76 W., to the N 1/4 corner of said Section 2; thence easterly along the north lines of Sections 2 and 1, T. 4 N., R. 76 W., to the NE corner of said Section 1, the point of beginning; and the above description contains 59.25 square miles, more or less, including water surface areas.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1004, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-5.

32-10-106. Board of directors - initial appointment. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1006, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-6.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 912, § 168, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-107. Board to file oath and bond. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1006, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-7.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-108. Oath and bond of directors. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1026, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-72.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 913, § 169, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-109. Organization of board - compensation - audit - removal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1006, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-8.

L. 77:

(4)(a) amended, p. 1513, § 79, effective July 15.

L. 96:

(4) amended, p. 549, § 2, effective April 24.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-110. Meetings - vacancies. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1007, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-9.

L. 90:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1499, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 91:

IP(1)(c) amended, p. 821, § 8, effective June 1.

L. 92:

(3) amended, p. 913, § 170, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-111. Directors - number - election - term. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1017, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-34.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 913, § 171, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-112. Vacancies. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1027, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-77.

L. 92:

(1)(a) and (3) amended, p. 914, § 172, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-113. Qualifications and nominations of candidates for district directors. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1018, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-37.

L. 75:

(2) amended, p. 221, § 71, effective July 16.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 914, § 173, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-114. Objections to nominations. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1018, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-38.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-115. General powers. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1007, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-10.

L. 79:

(1)(q) added, p. 1626, § 43, effective June 8.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-116. Contracts of district - requirements. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1009, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-11.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-117. Water, sanitation - charge for availability - power to compel connection. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1009, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-12.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-118. Water and sanitation - right to sell or lease water. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1010, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-13.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-119. Construction of facilities - duties. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1010, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-14.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-120. Revenues of district - collection. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1010, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-15.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-121. Levy and collection of taxes. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1011, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-16.

L. 77:

(3) amended, p. 1514, § 80, effective July 15.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-122. Levies to cover deficiencies. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1011, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-17.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-123. Inclusion in or exclusion from district - procedures. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1011, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-18.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1626, § 34, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(6)(c) amended, p. 914, § 174, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-124. Court proceedings - inclusion - exclusion. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1013, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-19.

L. 93:

(1.5) added, p. 84, § 3, effective March 29.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-125. Effect of inclusion or exclusion. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1014, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-20.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-126. Power to issue revenue bonds - terms. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1014, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-21.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-127. Power to incur indebtedness - interest - maturity - denominations. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1014, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-22.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-128. Debt question submitted to electors - resolution. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1015, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-23.

L. 92:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 915, § 175, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-129. Effect - subsequent elections. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1015, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-24.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 915, § 176, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-130. Correction of faulty notices. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1016, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-25.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-131. Early hearings. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1016, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-26.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-132. Refunding bonds. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1016, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-27.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-133. Limitations upon issuance. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1016, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-28.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-134. Use of proceeds of refunding bonds. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1016, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-29.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1120, § 43, effective July 1.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-135. Combination of refunding and other bonds. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1017, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-30.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-136. Board's determination final. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1017, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-31.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-137. Board of directors of district to conduct elections. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1017, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-32.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 916, § 177, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-138. Persons entitled to vote at district elections. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1017, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-33.

L. 87:

Entire section R&RE, p. 337, § 108, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1) to (3), IP(4), and (4)(c) amended, p. 916, § 178, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1791, § 81, effective June 6.

L. 94:

(4)(c) amended, p. 1643, § 70, effective May 31.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-139. Notice of election. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1018, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-35.

L. 87:

Entire section R&RE, p. 338, § 109, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-140. Copies of election laws and judges' instructions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1018, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-36.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 338, § 110, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-141. Judges of election. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1018, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-39.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-142. Oath of judges - compensation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1019, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-40.

L. 87:

(3) amended, p. 338, § 111, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-143. Precincts and polling places. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1019, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-41.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1514, § 81, effective July 15.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-144. Ballots, ballot boxes, electronic voting, and voting machines. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1019, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-42.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1514, § 82, effective July 15.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-145. Arrangements for voting. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1020, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-43.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-146. Hours of voting. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1020, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-44.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-147. Watchers. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1020, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-45.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-148. Judge to keep pollbook. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1021, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-46.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-149. Preparing to vote - affidavit. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1021, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-47.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-150. Manner of voting in precincts which use paper ballots. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1021, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-48.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-151. Disabled voter - assistance. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1021, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-49.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-152. Spoiled ballots. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1021, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-50.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-153. Count and certification of votes. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1022, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-51.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-154. Defective ballots. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1022, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-52.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-155. Return of ballot box, pollbook, and registration list. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1022, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-53.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-156. Preservation of records. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1022, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-54.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-157. Use of voting machines. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1022, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-55.

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 415, § 29, effective February 21.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-158. Judges to inspect machines. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1023, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-56.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-159. Ballot labels - voting machines. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1023, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-57.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-160. Close of polls and count of votes - voting machines. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1023, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-58.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-161. Absentee voting. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1023, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-59.

L. 77:

(3) amended, p. 234, § 10, effective June 19.

L. 80:

(1) amended, p. 415, § 30, effective February 21.

L. 87:

(3) amended, p. 338, § 112, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-162. Challenges. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1023, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-60.

L. 72:

p. 562, § 31.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-163. Canvass of votes - certificate of election. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1024, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-61.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-164. Imperfect returns. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1024, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-62.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-165. Corrections. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1024, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-63.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-166. Recount of votes - board to conduct. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1024, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-64.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-167. Tie - lots - notice to candidates. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1024, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-65.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-168. Contests. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1025, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-66.

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 416, § 31, effective February 21.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-169. District judge to preside - bond. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1025, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-67.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-170. Controversies. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1025, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-68.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-171. District attorney or attorney general to prosecute. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1025, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-69.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-172. Sufficiency of complaint - judicial notice. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1025, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-70.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-173. Election offenses - penalties. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1026, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-71.

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 439, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-174. Officers subject to recall. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1026, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-73.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 917, § 179, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-175. Recall - procedure - tampering with petition. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1026, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-74.

L. 85:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1122, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 88:

(2) added, p. 296, § 12, effective May 29.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-176. Recall petition - sufficiency - review. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1027, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-75.

L. 85:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1122, § 2, effective May 22.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-177. Recall election - resignation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1027, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-76.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1123, § 3, effective May 22.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-10-178. Transfer of functions to a service authority. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1028, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-78.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-179. Master plan - approval by board of county commissioners. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1028, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-24-79.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1095, § 8, effective May 27.

32-10-180. Application of special district act.

On and after May 27, 1997, and except as provided in this article, the three lakes water and sanitation district shall be subject to the provisions of the "Special District Act", article 1 of this title. All actions taken by the district under this article prior to May 27, 1997, shall be considered valid and effective, and any existing debt and bond obligations of the district shall be deemed valid, effective, and binding.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1095, § 7, effective May 27.